Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2934SV (1) 91 cm/ns S.F. 566 Section 1. JUDICIAL BRANCH ââ STUDY COMMITTEE ON COURT DEBT 1 SYSTEM. 2 1. The judicial branch shall convene a study committee 3 to produce a legislative proposal to overhaul the statutory 4 framework for the administration of the court debt system 5 with the goals of simplifying the statutory framework to 6 minimize error, decrease administrative burden, increase 7 efficiencies, and ensure accurate distribution. The purview of 8 the study committee includes but is not limited to reviewing 9 and providing recommendations to improve the administration of 10 the assessment, payment, collection, and distribution of court 11 debt. The purview of the study committee does not include 12 substantively reconsidering the amount of court debt assessed 13 against persons or the amount of moneys distributed to court 14 debt recipients. 15 2. The state court administrator, or the administratorâs 16 designee, shall be the chairperson of the study committee. In 17 addition to the members required under paragraphs âaâ and âbâ, 18 the state court administrator may also appoint other members 19 with relevant knowledge of the administration of the court debt 20 system. 21 a. The membership of the committee shall consist of the 22 following persons or that personâs designee: 23 (1) The governor. 24 (2) The secretary of state. 25 (3) The treasurer of state. 26 (4) The director of the department of management. 27 (5) The director of the department of transportation. 28 (6) The commissioner of public safety. 29 (7) The director of the department of health and human 30 services. 31 (8) The director of revenue. 32 (9) The director of the department of corrections. 33 (10) The attorney general. 34 (11) The president of the Iowa state sheriffsâ and deputiesâ 35 -1- LSB 2934SV (1) 91 cm/ns 1/ 3 S.F. 566 association. 1 (12) The executive director of the Iowa state association 2 of counties. 3 (13) The executive director of the Iowa county attorneys 4 association. 5 (14) The executive director of the Iowa league of cities. 6 b. The membership of the committee shall also consist of the 7 following legislative members: 8 (1) One member of the senate appointed by the majority 9 leader of the senate. 10 (2) One member of the senate appointed by the minority 11 leader of the senate. 12 (3) One member of the house of representatives appointed by 13 the speaker of the house of representatives. 14 (4) One member of the house of representatives appointed by 15 the minority leader of the house of representatives. 16 3. The study committee shall submit recommendations for the 17 statutory reform of the administration of the court debt system 18 in the form of a proposed legislative bill to the chairpersons 19 of the senate and house of representatives standing committees 20 on judiciary no later than November 1, 2025. 21